Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3827.02
Penalty clause for contest.

A provision in a trust purporting to penalize any interested person for contesting the trust or instituting other proceedings relating to the trust is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 22.
July 18, 2026